Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-501.01
Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome; legislative findings.

The Legislature recognizes that acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, AIDS, is an incurable life-threatening illness which is epidemic in the United States. Persons who suffer from acquired immunodeficiency syndrome and its related diseases and conditions must receive appropriate and humane care. All members of the general public must have accurate and complete information concerning the characteristics of the disease and the avoidance of infection. The public must be motivated to protect themselves and others against the spread of the disease. The successful containment of the epidemic calls for strong commitment and support from all segments of our society. It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize a program of services to protect the public health.

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 1.